New Jersey, session 221, S1467.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A school district, charter school, or renaissance school project that employs a school psychologist and offers in-person school psychology services to students in grades kindergarten through 12, or any combination thereof, shall permit students to attend counseling sessions or meetings of any kind with the school psychologist for counseling purposes, through virtual or remote means, unless the school psychologist determines that in-person counseling is in the best interest of the student. b.  Nothing in subsection a. of this section shall be construed to prohibit any student from attending an in-person counseling session or meeting with a school psychologist employed by the school district, charter school, or renaissance school project. c.  As used in this section, school psychologist means a person who holds a New Jersey standard educational services certificate with a school psychologist endorsement. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year after the date of enactment.